Utah statutes.
17-16-19.   Salaries to be full compensation -- Compensation for deputies.

The salaries herein provided for shall be full compensation for all services of every kind and description rendered by the officers named herein; and where deputies or assistants have been allowed to any such officers the salary of any deputy or assistant shall be fixed by the county legislative body, and shall be a county charge.

